Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-354
Monuments; markers; eminent domain.

The county board shall have the right of eminent domain for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 23-351 to 23-355.

Laws 1927, c. 52, § 4, p. 207;

C.S.1929, § 26-804;

R.S.1943, § 23-354.